Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.130

Temporary cease and desist order—Licensee's application for injunction.

Within ten days after a licensee has been served with a temporary cease and desist order, the licensee may apply to the superior court in the county of its principal place of business for an injunction setting aside, limiting, or suspending the order pending the completion of the administrative proceedings pursuant to the notice served under RCW 31.45.120. The superior court has jurisdiction to issue the injunction.

[ 1991 c 355 s 13.]